Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1443.01
Relative, defined.

Relative shall mean any person related to another by blood or marriage to the third degree of consanguinity, including a foster parent, foster child, stepparent, stepchild, and adopted children and their adoptive parents.

Laws 2000, LB 1021, § 4.